Georgia, session 2025_26, HB303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 3 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state flag, seal,
and other symbols, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
"ARTICLE 8
50-3-130.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Original 33 Memorial Act.'
50-3-131.
(a) There shall be placed upon the capitol grounds of the state capitol building or in
another prominent place a monument in honor of the Original 33, the Black legislators
expelled from the General Assembly following the end of Reconstruction, subject to the
availability of private funds for such purpose.
(b) Unless public safety concerns warrant postponement, such monument shall be procured
and placed as soon as practicable."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 303
- 2 -